Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1707, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1707. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is hereby
authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, or condemnation,
land or such interest therein as in its discretion may be necessary
for the purpose of establishing, constructing, maintaining and
operating turnpike projects or relocation thereof, and facilities
Req. No. 12708 Page 1

nece ssary and incident thereto, or necessary in the restoration of
public or private property damaged or destroyed, including borrow
areas, detours, channel changes, concession areas, public or private
access roads, and deposits of rock, gravel, sand and other road
building material for use in turnpike construction and maintenance,
upon such terms and at such price as may be considered by it to be
reasonable and can be agreed upon between the Authority and the
owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of the
Authority, provided, that such right and title shall be limited to
the surface rights only and shall not include oil or other mineral
rights. Groundwater rights may be severed from surface rights, upon
the written request of the owner of land to be acquired; however, an
owner of groundwater rights shall not have a right of access to the
Authority's acquired surface rights. No person may construct,
maintain or operate any water well, drilling equipment or lines on
or under the surface acquired by the Authority without express
written approval of the Authority.
In addition to compensation for the taking of property, property
owners with property abutting turnpike projects shall be entitled to
compensation for the nuisance caused to their properties by turnpike
projects, whether directly or indirectly. Nuisance to the property
shall include noise and light pollution, damage to access, light,
view, loss of use and enjoyment of one’s property, and any
diminution in the fair market value of the property.
Req. No. 12708 Page 2

At the time the Authority commences the process of any right-of-
way acquisition for all or a portion of a turnpike project, whether
by way of voluntary purchase or condemnation, the Authority shall
provide written notice, via certified and first-class mail, of such
intended right-of-way acquisition to any and all owners of real
property abutting the right-of-way to be acquired for the project.
The written notice to abutting property owners shall include a
statement that the abutting property owners are entitled to
compensation as set forth in this section, and that they may request
compensation for nuisance caused to their property by the turnpike
project. Compensation for nuisance shall be ten percent (10%) of
the value of the property extending eight hundred (800) feet from
the boundary of the right-of-way acquired for the project. The
notice shall include a mailing address for abutting owners to submit
a written request for compensation and for compensation for nuisance
to their property caused by the turnpike project. Any abutting
property owner requesting compensation and compensation for nuisance
shall make such request to the Authority in writing, via certified
and first-class mail, to the address designated in the Authority’s
right-of-way acquisition notice, no later than thirty (30) days
after the date of receipt of the Authority’s notice of the intended
right-of-way acquisition.
Upon receipt of a valid request for compensation and nuisance
compensation, the Authority shall proceed to make a good-faith offer
Req. No. 12708 Page 3

of t otal compensation, and further, shall negotiate in good faith
with the abutting property owner to reach an agreement for total
compensation. If the parties fail to agree upon the amount of such
total compensation within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date
the property owner requests such total compensation, the Authority
shall, within an additional ninety (90) days, commence an action in
the district court where the real property is located for a
determination and award to the property owner of such total
compensation. Either party to the action shall be entitled to a
trial by jury. If the award of total compensation in any such
action exceeds the Authority’s last best offer to the property owner
by ten percent (10%) or more, the property owner shall be entitled
to reasonable attorney fees, appraisal fees, and expert witness fees
incurred in the action.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12708 JBH 02/17/25




Req. No. 12708 Page 4